Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.115

Unprofessional conduct—Certain contracts—General power of attorney—Presumption.

Entering into a contract, including a general power of attorney, that gives a bail bond agent full authority over a person's finances, assets, real property, or personal property creates a presumption of unprofessional conduct that may be overcome by a preponderance of the evidence presented to the department to the contrary. The department has the discretion to determine whether or not the bail bond agency or agent has overcome the presumption and if unprofessional conduct was committed.

[ 2016 c 73 s 1.]